Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2103
Director; authority.

The Director of Agriculture, on behalf of the State of Nebraska, is authorized to enter into an agreement with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, upon such terms and conditions and for such periods of time as may be mutually agreeable, to accept, administer, expend, and use in the State of Nebraska all or any part of the trust assets or any other funds made available under the provisions of the federal act specified in section 2-2101.

Laws 1951, c. 4, § 3, p. 65.